Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2309
Certificate of competency; applicant; bond; conditions.

All applicants who have successfully passed the examination may, prior to receiving a certificate of competency, be required by the air conditioning air distribution board to furnish a corporate surety bond in the penal sum of not more than ten thousand dollars conditioned that the applicant shall, in all material by him furnished and in all work by him done and performed within the city or village or within the area of zoning jurisdiction outside the corporate limits of cities of the metropolitan class, in installing, altering and repairing any air conditioning air distribution system or ventilating system, strictly comply with all regulations of the board and ordinances of the city or village related thereto.

Laws 1969, c. 98, § 9, p. 471.